Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-1205
License; application; investigation; issuance.

Upon the filing of the application and the payment of the fees and the approval of the bond, the secretary shall investigate the facts and if he or she finds that the financial responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness of the applicant and of the members thereof, if the applicant is a partnership, a limited liability company, or an association, and of the officers and directors thereof, if the applicant is a corporation, are such as to command the confidence of the community to warrant belief that the business will be operated fairly and honestly within the purposes of sections 69-1201 to 69-1217 and that the applicant or the applicant and the members thereof or the applicant and the officers and directors thereof have not been convicted of a felony, or that such person has not had a record of having defaulted in the payment of money collected for others, including the discharge of such debts through bankruptcy proceedings, the secretary shall issue the applicant a license to engage in the debt management business in accordance with sections 69-1201 to 69-1217. The secretary may require as part of the application a credit report and other information.

Laws 1967, c. 377, § 5, p. 1181;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 412.